Illinois, session 104th, SB4121.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated for the 7ordinary and contingent expenses of the Illinois Commerce 8Commission:9CHAIRMAN AND COMMISSIONER'S OFFICE10Payable from Transportation Regulatory Fund:11  For Personal Services...............................137,00012  For State Contributions to State13   Employees' Retirement System........................60,00014  For State Contributions to Social Security...........10,50015  For Group Insurance..................................35,20016  For Contractual Services................................50017  For Travel............................................1,50018  For Equipment.............................................019  For Telecommunication Services........................4,50020  For Operation of Auto Equipment...........................021    Total                                            $249,20022Payable from Public Utility Fund:23  For Personal Services.............................1,356,500  SB4121- 2 -OMB104 00229 AAV 10229 b1  For State Contributions to State2   Employees' Retirement System.......................595,0003  For State Contributions to Social Security..........104,6004  For Group Insurance.................................387,2005  For Contractual Services.............................33,3006  For Travel...........................................85,0007  For Commodities.......................................1,0008  For Equipment...........................................5009  For Telecommunication Services.......................14,50010  For Operation of Auto Equipment.........................50011    Total                                          $2,578,100 12    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 14Public Utility Fund for the ordinary and contingent expenses 15of the Illinois Commerce Commission:16PUBLIC UTILITIES17  For Personal Services............................20,820,00018  For State Contributions to State19   Employees' Retirement System.....................8,610,80020  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,588,40021  For Group Insurance...............................5,913,60022  For Contractual Services..........................8,343,30023  For Travel..........................................260,00024  For Commodities......................................34,00025  For Printing.........................................22,000  SB4121- 3 -OMB104 00229 AAV 10229 b1  For Equipment.......................................545,0002  For Electronic Data Processing......................566,0003  For Telecommunication Services......................245,0004  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................58,0005  For Refunds..........................................26,5006    Total                                         $47,032,600 7    Section 10. The sum of $7,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 9Underground Utility Facilities Damage Prevention Fund to the 10Illinois Commerce Commission for a grant to the Statewide 11One-call Notice System, as required in the Illinois 12Underground Utility Facilities Damage Prevention Act. 13    Section 15. The sum of $50,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Underground 15Utility Facilities Damage Prevention Fund to the Illinois 16Commerce Commission for refunds. 17    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 19from the Transportation Regulatory Fund for ordinary and 20contingent expenses to the Illinois Commerce Commission:21TRANSPORTATION22  For Personal Services.............................9,110,00023  For State Contributions to State  SB4121- 4 -OMB104 00229 AAV 10229 b1   Employees' Retirement System.....................3,960,0002  For State Contributions to Social Security..........696,3003  For Group Insurance...............................2,534,4004  For Contractual Services..........................1,872,5005  For Travel...........................................93,0006  For Commodities......................................45,0007  For Printing.........................................60,0008  For Equipment.......................................712,5009  For Electronic Data Processing......................313,00010  For Telecommunication Services......................409,50011  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................103,00012  For Refunds..........................................24,70013    Total                                         $19,933,900 14    Section 25. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Transportation 16Regulatory Fund to the Illinois Commerce Commission for (1) 17disbursing funds collected for the Single State Insurance 18Registration Program and/or Unified Carrier Registration 19System; (2) for refunds for overpayments; and (3) for 20administrative expenses. 21    Section 30. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 23Telecommunications Access Corporation Fund to the Illinois 24Commerce Commission for administrative costs and for   SB4121- 5 -OMB104 00229 AAV 10229 b1distribution to the Illinois Telecommunications Access 2Corporation, as required in the Illinois Public Utilities Act, 3Section 13-703. 4    Section 35. The sum of $12,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Public Utility Fund 6to the Illinois Commerce Commission for all costs associated 7with the administration of the Energy Transition Act. 8    Section 40. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the Consumer Intervenor 10Compensation Fund to the Illinois Commerce Commission for all 11costs and expenses associated with the administration of the 12Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund, and amendments to 13Section 9-229 of the Illinois Public Utilities Act resulting 14from enactment of Illinois Public Act 102-0662. 15    Section 45. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the ICC Federal Grants 17Trust Fund to the Illinois Commerce Commission for a grant to 18the Illinois Fire Chiefs Association Educational and Research 19Foundation for costs associated with training of first 20responders in planning for and responding to pipeline 21emergencies. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 232026.